Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.160

Educational records—Permanent file—Protection.

If any private vocational school discontinues its operation, the chief administrative officer of the school shall file with the agency the original or legible true copies of all educational records required by the agency. If the agency determines that any educational records are in danger of being made unavailable to the agency, the agency may seek a court order to protect and if necessary take possession of the records. The agency shall cause to be maintained a permanent file of educational records coming into its possession.

[ 1986 c 299 s 16.]